src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv11_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: song
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: song
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: song
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: [seingjar, songar]
    song+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: [seingir, sengur]
    song+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: seingjum
    song+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: seingja
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: [seingin, songin]
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: [seingina, songina]
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: [seingini, songini]
    song+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: [seingjarinnar, songarinnar]
    song+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: [seingirnar, sengurnar]
    song+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: seingjunum
    song+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: seingjanna
